Hawaii statutes.
[§457-9.5] Center for nursing fee.
[(a)] Upon the issuance of a new license and at each license renewal period,
each nurse shall pay an additional fee of $40, which shall be deposited in a
separate account in the compliance resolution fund established pursuant to
section 26-9(o).

[(b)] The director of commerce and consumer
affairs shall disburse on a quarterly basis from the compliance resolution
fund, established pursuant to section 26-9(o), to the credit of the center for
nursing special fund all moneys deposited in the separate account established
pursuant to [this section]. [L 2003, c 198, §§3, 6, 10; am L 2008, c 173, §2;
am L 2012, c 53, §1]

Revision Note

L 2003, c 198, §6 is codified to this section pursuant to
§23G-15.

Cross References

Center for nursing special fund, see §304A-2163.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next